Utah statutes.
17B-2a-203.   Provisions applicable to drainage districts.

(1)  Each drainage district is governed by and has the powers stated in:

(a)  this part; and

(b)  Chapter 1, Provisions Applicable to All Local Districts.

(2)  This part applies only to drainage districts.

(3)  A drainage district is not subject to the provisions of any other part of this chapter.

(4)  If there is a conflict between a provision in Chapter 1, Provisions Applicable to All Local Districts, and a provision in this part, the provision in this part governs.

